DI-24
DIAGNOSTICS - ANTI-LOCKBRAKE SYSTEM

DIAGNOSTIC TROUBLE CODE CHART

NOTICE:

When removing the part, turn the ignition switch OFF.

HINT:

e UsingSST09843 -180200r09843 -18040,connecttheterminalsTcandE ] ofcheck connectororTc
and CG of DLC3, and remove the short pin.

. Ifany abnormality is notfound wheninspecting parts, inspectthe ECU.

. Ifamalfunction code is displayed duringthe DTC check, check the circuit listed for that code. For de-
tails of each code, turn to the page referred to under the "See page” for respective "DTC No.” in the

DI28U-14

DTC chart.
DTC No. )
Detection ltem Trouble Area
(See Page)
co0278/ 11 N . .
Open or short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
() « ABS solenaidrelac)
C0279/ 12 * ABS solenoid relay circuit
(1) B+ short circuit in ABS solenoid relay circuit
C0226/2 1 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SFRcircuit) * SFRR or SFRH circuit
C0236/22 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SFLcircuit) e SFLRor SFLH circuit
C0246/23 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (SRRcircuit) *SRHor SRRcircuit
C1225/25 Open or shortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit * Hydraulic brake booster
() (SA1 circuit) * SA1 circuit
C1226/26 Open orshortcircuitin hydraulic brake booster solenoid circuit ¢ Hydraulic brake booster
() (SA2circuit) * SA2circuit

]
C0200/3 1*
()

]
C0205/32* . .
(1) Left front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction « Right front, leftfront, right rear and left rear speed sensor

e Each speed'sensor circuit

Right front wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

0210/33* -
()
C0215/34%
()

Right rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction * Sensor rotor

Left rear wheel speed sensor signal malfunction

C1237/37 . . . L
(1) Some tire is different size from the other tires Tire size
* Batter
C1241/ 41 . o y
(1) Low battery voltage or open circuitin IG 1 circuit ¢ Charging system
* Power source circuit
*2 Batter
C1242/42 . . “Rarery
() Open circuit in G2 circuit ¢ Charging system
* Power source circuit
C1243/43 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor (constant output) j )
() * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1244/44 o . o ¢ Deceleration sensor
Open or short circuit in deceleration sensor circuit ) -
(o) « Deceleration sensor circuit
C1245/45 L . * Deceleration sensor
Malfunction in deceleration sensor . .
() * Wire harness for deceleration sensor system
C1248/48 * Openorshortcircuitin rear differential lock circuit « Rear differential lock
() « Rear differential is locking « Rear differential lock circuit
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C1249/49
(9)

Open circuit in stop light switch circuit

* Stop light bulb
« Stop light switch circuit

2
C1251/51%
()

* Pump motor is locked
¢ Open circuit in pump motor ground

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2
C1252/ 52*
()

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor malfunction

* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit
* Pressure switch (PH or PL)

2
C1253/53*
(0)

Hydraulic brake booster pump motor relay malfunction

* ABS motor relay
* ABS motor relay circuit
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor circuit

C1254/54%"
(0)

Pressure switch malfunction

* Pressure switch (PH or PL)
e Pressure switch circuit

2
C1256 / 56*
()

Accumulator low pressure malfunction

* Accumulator
¢ Pressure switch (PH or PL)
* Hydraulic brake booster pump motor

2
C1257 / 57*
(o)

Power supply drive circuit malfunction

 Battery
* Power Source circuit
*ABS ECU

Always ON

(1) Malfunction in ABS ECU

* Battery

« Charging system

* Power source circuit
*ABSECU

0: Refgr LAND CRUISER Chassis and Body Repair Manual (Pub. No. RM6

16E).

« *:Asthe DTCcannotbe erasedbyreplacing parts alone do either ofthe following operations.

(1) Clear the DTC (See page DI-17).
(g) Atthe vehicle speed of 20 km/h (

12mph), drive the vehicle for 30 sec. ormore.

e  * :Using the following table, troubled parts can be specified.

DTC C1242/42 | C1251/51 |C1252/52 | C1253/53 |C1254/54 |C1256/56 |C1257/57
BRAKE Warning ||ght and buzzer Light | Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light |Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light | Buzzer| Light |Buzzer| Light |Buzzer|
O O O 0 O
Pressure switch PH
PL 0 O 0 0 0
Pump motor e 0|0
Pump motor circuit MTT wire harness S e
MT+ wire harness D
MT- wire harness 0
Accumulator malfunction O|D
MR1 open circuit 0
L MR2 open circuit .
Motor relay circuit 0l o 0
MR1 welded contact
MR2 welded contact Y -
Hydraulic brake booster|pressure leaks o |0 oo
Power souce* IG2 open circuit .
ECU Power supply circuit 0

*: When IG1 circuit is open, ABS warning light and BRAKE warning light come on.
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